Connecticut, session 2026, SB00429.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 17b-273 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) On and after April 1, 1983, the Commissioner of Social Services
shall increase the payment rate for ambulance rides eligible under the
state medical assistance program. Subject to federal approval, beginning
with the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2015, the Commissioner of Social
Services shall, within available appropriations, revise the payment
methodology for ambulance services under the Medicaid program to
apply a relative value unit system similar to the payment methodology
used in the Medicare program. The basic life support nonemergency
transport shall be designated as the base rate with the relative value unit
system applied to basic life support nonemergency transports, basic life
support emergency transports, advanced life support nonemergency
transports, advanced life support emergency transports and paramedic
intercept services. For purposes of this section, "relative value unit"
means a numeric value for ambulance services relative to the value of a
base level ambulance service.

Senate Bill No. 429
(b) On and after July 1, 2026, the Commissioner of Social Services
shall base the out-of-district mileage calculation for ambulance services
reimbursed under the state medical assistance program on the distance
traveled by an ambulance with the patient onboard from the point of
patient pickup to the destination, rounded to the nearest one-tenth of a
mile. An ambulance service may use any reasonable and verifiable
method to document such mileage, including, but not limited to, global
positioning system data, navigation or dispatch computer systems or
commercially available mapping routing programs. The commissioner
shall require an ambulance service provider to maintain documentation
of such mileage as part of the patient care record, including, but not
limited to, a trip report with the name of the patient and street address
of the patient pickup point and destination.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 2, 2026
Public Act No. 26-88 2 of 2